Rhode Island statutes. Title 40 Human Services
Chapter 8.4 Health Care for Families

40-8.4-1.
Title.

This chapter is hereby entitled “The Health Care for Families Act.”

History of Section.

P.L. 1998, ch. 31, art. 33, § 1.

40-8.4-2.
Purpose.

It is the intent of the general assembly to continue to meet the goal established in 1993 pursuant to §

42-12.3-2

to ensure access to comprehensive health care by providing or creating access to health insurance to all Rhode Islanders who are uninsured. Over the course of several years, health insurance through the RIte Care program has been extended to pregnant women and children living in families whose income is less than two hundred fifty percent (250%) of the federal poverty level. Many of the parents of these children are uninsured and without the means to purchase health insurance. Federal funds are available to help pay for health insurance for low-income families through the medical assistance program under § 1931 of Title XIX of the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. § 1396u-1, which de-links medical assistance from cash assistance and allows for expanded income and resource methodologies. It is the intent of the general assembly, therefore, to implement § 1931 of Title XIX of the Social Security Act and, in addition, to provide expanded access to health insurance for eligible families. Federal funds for some children and pregnant women may also be available under Title XXI of the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. § 1397aa et seq., and it is further the intent of the general assembly to access these funds as appropriate and as authorized in accordance with the legal authority provided by the Children’s Health Insurance Program Reauthorization Act of 2009 (CHIPRA), and Title XXI of the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. § 1397aa et seq.

History of Section.

P.L. 1998, ch. 31, art. 33, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 68, art. 23, § 4; P.L. 2020, ch. 79, art. 1, § 31.

40-8.4-3.
Definitions.

“Family” means a minor child or children and the parent(s) or relative as defined in § 40-5.1-3 [repealed], with whom they reside, including two-parent families in which one parent is working more than one hundred (100) hours per month.

“Minor child” means a child under the age of eighteen (18) or who is eighteen (18) and a full-time student in a secondary school or in the equivalent level of vocational or technical training.

History of Section.

P.L. 1998, ch. 31, art. 33, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 216, § 20.

40-8.4-4.
Eligibility.

Medical assistance for families. There is hereby established a category of medical assistance eligibility pursuant to § 1931 of Title XIX of the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. § 1396u-1, for families whose income and resources are no greater than the standards in effect in the aid to families with dependent children program on July 16, 1996, or such increased standards as the department may determine. The executive office of health and human services is directed to amend the medical assistance Title XIX state plan and to submit to the United States Department of Health and Human Services an amendment to the RIte Care waiver project to provide for medical assistance coverage to families under this chapter in the same amount, scope, and duration as coverage provided to comparable groups under the waiver. The department is further authorized and directed to submit amendments and/or requests for waivers to the Title XXI state plan as may be necessary to maximize federal contribution for provision of medical assistance coverage provided pursuant to this chapter, including providing medical coverage as a “qualified state” in accordance with Title XXI of the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. § 1397aa et seq. Implementation of expanded coverage under this chapter shall not be delayed pending federal review of any Title XXI amendment or waiver.

Income. The secretary of the executive office of health and human services is authorized and directed to amend the medical assistance Title XIX state plan or RIte Care waiver to provide medical assistance coverage through expanded income disregards or other methodology for parents or relative caretakers whose income levels are below one hundred thirty-three percent (133%) of the federal poverty level.

History of Section.

P.L. 1998, ch. 31, art. 33, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 200, § 3; P.L. 2000, ch. 229, § 3; P.L. 2002, ch. 65, art. 32, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 117, art. 12, § 2; P.L. 2006, ch. 246, art. 25, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 100, art. 10, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 68, art. 23, §§ 4, 13; P.L. 2013, ch. 144, art. 19, § 4.

40-8.4-5.
Managed care.

The delivery and financing of the healthcare services provided under this chapter shall be provided through a system of managed care. A managed care system integrates an efficient financing mechanism with quality service delivery; provides a “medical home” to ensure appropriate care and deter unnecessary and inappropriate care; and places emphasis on preventive and primary health care.

History of Section.

P.L. 1998, ch. 31, art. 33, § 1.

40-8.4-6.
Administration.

The department of human services shall ensure that eligibility and enrollment are determined and provided in a timely, efficient, and user-friendly manner, including mail-in applications. The department may enter into any necessary cooperative agreements with the department of health and/or other state agencies to achieve the purposes of this section. Children and families applying for cash assistance through the family independence program, §

40-5.1-1

et seq. [repealed], shall not be required to complete a separate application for medical assistance under this chapter.

By December 1, 2006, the department shall provide to the chair of the senate health and human services committee, the chair of the house health, education and welfare committee, and to the chairs of the house and senate finance committees a report describing a process for renewing eligibility for the RIte care program by using an “ex-parte” process whereby the department uses information provided to the department from the recipients’ cash assistance, food stamp, and/or childcare assistance records and from other reliable sources that are readily available to the department. The report shall include at a minimum: how the ex-parte renewal process will work; the date by which the process could be implemented; the number and types of cases to which the ex-parte renewal process is anticipated to be applied; the costs and anticipated savings of implementing the process; and how the department will assure the accuracy of the eligibility determination when the ex-parte process is used. The department shall consult with, and as appropriate include, members of the RIte care consumer advisory council in preparing this report.

History of Section.

P.L. 1998, ch. 31, art. 33, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 603, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 615, § 1.

40-8.4-7.
Buy-In.

The department of human services shall investigate and develop opportunities for individuals and/or employers to buy into, at the individual’s and/or employer’s expense, one or more programs the department may establish under this chapter or chapter 12.3 of title 42 to address un-insurance among Rhode Islanders, and shall provide a report on these efforts to the permanent joint committee on health care oversight established pursuant to §

40-8.4-14

on or before February 15 of each year.

History of Section.

P.L. 1998, ch. 31, art. 33, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 413, § 2; P.L. 2000, ch. 200, § 3; P.L. 2000, ch. 229, § 3.

40-8.4-8.
Appropriations — Authorization to pay for health care.

The general assembly shall annually appropriate to the department of human services the sums as it may deem necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter. Authorization to pay for healthcare services specified in this chapter shall be made by representatives of the department of human services, and the state controller is hereby authorized and directed to draw his or her orders upon the general treasurer for the payment of the sum or sums or so much thereof as may be required from time to time, upon the receipt by him or her of properly authenticated vouchers; provided, however, that the department of human services may enter into cooperative agreements for the transfer of funds to effectuate the purposes set forth in this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1998, ch. 31, art. 33, § 1.

40-8.4-9.
Assignment of medical support rights.

Any person who is determined eligible for healthcare assistance under this chapter is hereby deemed to have made an assignment of rights to medical support in accordance with §

40-6-9(b)

, and the provisions of §

40-6-9(b)

and (d) are incorporated by reference and shall apply to such person.

History of Section.

P.L. 1998, ch. 31, art. 33, § 1.

40-8.4-10.
Regulations.

The department of human services is authorized to promulgate any regulations necessary to implement this chapter.

When promulgating any rule or regulation necessary to implement this chapter, or any rule or regulation related to RIte Care, the department shall send the notice referred to in §

42-35-3

and a true copy of the rule referred to in §

42-35-4

of the Rhode Island administrative procedures act to each of the co-chairpersons of the permanent joint committee on health care oversight established by §

40-8.4-14

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1998, ch. 31, art. 33, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 200, § 3; P.L. 2000, ch. 229, § 3.

40-8.4-11.
Severability.

If any provision in any section of this chapter, or the application thereof, to any person or circumstances is held invalid, its invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of this chapter that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this chapter are severable.

History of Section.

P.L. 1998, ch. 31, art. 33, § 1.

40-8.4-12.
RIte Share health insurance premium assistance program.

Basic RIte Share health insurance premium assistance program. Under the terms of Section 1906 of Title XIX of the U.S. Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. § 1396e, states are permitted to pay a Medicaid-eligible person’s share of the costs for enrolling in employer-sponsored health insurance (ESI) coverage if it is cost-effective to do so. Pursuant to the general assembly’s direction in the Rhode Island health reform act of 2000, the Medicaid agency requested and obtained federal approval under § 1916, 42 U.S.C. § 1396o, to establish the RIte Share premium assistance program to subsidize the costs of enrolling Medicaid-eligible persons and families in employer-sponsored health insurance plans that have been approved as meeting certain cost and coverage requirements. The Medicaid agency also obtained, at the general assembly’s direction, federal authority to require any such persons with access to ESI coverage to enroll as a condition of retaining eligibility providing that doing so meets the criteria established in Title XIX for obtaining federal matching funds.

Definitions. For the purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

“Cost-effective” means that the portion of the ESI that the state would subsidize, as well as wrap-around costs, would on average cost less to the state than enrolling that same person/family in a managed-care delivery system.

“Cost sharing” means any co-payments, deductibles, or co-insurance associated with ESI.

“Employee premium” means the monthly premium share a person or family is required to pay to the employer to obtain and maintain ESI coverage.

“Employer-sponsored insurance” or “ESI” means health insurance or a group health plan offered to employees by an employer. This includes plans purchased by small employers through the state health insurance marketplace, healthsource, RI (HSRI).

“Policy holder” means the person in the household with access to ESI, typically the employee.

“RIte Share-approved employer-sponsored insurance (ESI)” means an employer-sponsored health insurance plan that meets the coverage and cost-effectiveness criteria for RIte Share.

“RIte Share buy-in” means the monthly amount an Medicaid-ineligible policy holder must pay toward RIte Share-approved ESI that covers the Medicaid-eligible children, young adults, or spouses with access to the ESI. The buy-in only applies in instances when household income is above one hundred fifty percent (150%) of the FPL.

“RIte Share premium assistance program” means the Rhode Island Medicaid premium assistance program in which the State pays the eligible Medicaid member’s share of the cost of enrolling in a RIte Share-approved ESI plan. This allows the state to share the cost of the health insurance coverage with the employer.

“RIte Share unit” means the entity within the executive office of health and human services (EOHHS) responsible for assessing the cost-effectiveness of ESI, contacting employers about ESI as appropriate, initiating the RIte Share enrollment and disenrollment process, handling member communications, and managing the overall operations of the RIte Share program.

“Third-party liability (TPL)” means other health insurance coverage. This insurance is in addition to Medicaid and is usually provided through an employer. Since Medicaid is always the payer of last resort, the TPL is always the primary coverage.

“Wrap-around services or coverage” means any healthcare services not included in the ESI plan that would have been covered had the Medicaid member been enrolled in a RIte Care or Rhody Health Partners plan. Coverage of deductibles and co-insurance is included in the wrap. Co-payments to providers are not covered as part of the wrap-around coverage.

RIte Share populations. Medicaid beneficiaries subject to RIte Share include: children, families, parent and caretakers eligible for Medicaid or the children’s health insurance program (CHIP) under this chapter or chapter 12.3 of title 42; and adults between the ages of nineteen (19) and sixty-four (64) who are eligible under chapter 8.12 of this title, not receiving or eligible to receive Medicare, and are enrolled in managed care delivery systems. The following conditions apply:

The income of Medicaid beneficiaries shall affect whether and in what manner they must participate in RIte Share as follows:

Income at or below one hundred fifty percent (150%) of FPL — Persons and families determined to have household income at or below one hundred fifty percent (150%) of the federal poverty level (FPL) guidelines based on the modified adjusted gross income (MAGI) standard or other standard approved by the secretary are required to participate in RIte Share if a Medicaid-eligible adult or parent/caretaker has access to cost-effective ESI. Enrolling in ESI through RIte Share shall be a condition of maintaining Medicaid health coverage for any eligible adult with access to such coverage.

Income above one hundred fifty percent (150%) of FPL and policy holder is not Medicaid-eligible — Premium assistance is available when the household includes Medicaid-eligible members, but the ESI policy holder (typically a parent/caretaker, or spouse) is not eligible for Medicaid. Premium assistance for parents/caretakers and other household members who are not Medicaid-eligible may be provided in circumstances when enrollment of the Medicaid-eligible family members in the approved ESI plan is contingent upon enrollment of the ineligible policy holder and the executive office of health and human services (executive office) determines, based on a methodology adopted for such purposes, that it is cost-effective to provide premium assistance for family or spousal coverage.

RIte Share enrollment as a condition of eligibility. For Medicaid beneficiaries over the age of nineteen (19), enrollment in RIte Share shall be a condition of eligibility except as exempted below and by regulations promulgated by the executive office.

Medicaid-eligible children and young adults up to age nineteen (19) shall not be required to enroll in a parent/caretaker relative’s ESI as a condition of maintaining Medicaid eligibility if the person with access to RIte Share-approved ESI does not enroll as required. These Medicaid-eligible children and young adults shall remain eligible for Medicaid and shall be enrolled in a RIte Care plan.

There shall be a limited six-month (6) exemption from the mandatory enrollment requirement for persons participating in the RI works program pursuant to chapter 5.2 of this title.

Approval of health insurance plans for premium assistance. The executive office of health and human services shall adopt regulations providing for the approval of employer-based health insurance plans for premium assistance and shall approve employer-based health insurance plans based on these regulations. In order for an employer-based health insurance plan to gain approval, the executive office must determine that the benefits offered by the employer-based health insurance plan are substantially similar in amount, scope, and duration to the benefits provided to Medicaid-eligible persons enrolled in a Medicaid managed care plan, when the plan is evaluated in conjunction with available supplemental benefits provided by the office. The office shall obtain and make available to persons otherwise eligible for Medicaid identified in this section as supplemental benefits those benefits not reasonably available under employer-based health insurance plans that are required for Medicaid beneficiaries by state law or federal law or regulation. Once it has been determined by the Medicaid agency that the ESI offered by a particular employer is RIte Share-approved, all Medicaid members with access to that employer’s plan are required to participate in RIte Share. Failure to meet the mandatory enrollment requirement shall result in the termination of the Medicaid eligibility of the policy holder and other Medicaid members nineteen (19) or older in the household who could be covered under the ESI until the policy holder complies with the RIte Share enrollment procedures established by the executive office.

Premium assistance. The executive office shall provide premium assistance by paying all or a portion of the employee’s cost for covering the eligible person and/or his or her family under such a RIte Share-approved ESI plan subject to the buy-in provisions in this section.

Buy-in. Persons who can afford it shall share in the cost. — The executive office is authorized and directed to apply for and obtain any necessary state plan and/or waiver amendments from the Secretary of the United States Department of Health and Human Services (DHHS) to require that persons enrolled in a RIte Share-approved employer-based health plan who have income equal to or greater than one hundred fifty percent (150%) of the FPL to buy-in to pay a share of the costs based on the ability to pay, provided that the buy-in cost shall not exceed five percent (5%) of the person’s annual income. The executive office shall implement the buy-in by regulation, and shall consider co-payments, premium shares, or other reasonable means to do so.

Maximization of federal contribution. The executive office of health and human services is authorized and directed to apply for and obtain federal approvals and waivers necessary to maximize the federal contribution for provision of medical assistance coverage under this section, including the authorization to amend the Title XXI state plan and to obtain any waivers necessary to reduce barriers to provide premium assistance to recipients as provided for in Title XXI of the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. § 1397aa et seq.

Implementation by regulation. The executive office of health and human services is authorized and directed to adopt regulations to ensure the establishment and implementation of the premium assistance program in accordance with the intent and purpose of this section, the requirements of Title XIX, Title XXI, and any approved federal waivers.

Outreach and reporting. The executive office of health and human services shall develop a plan to identify Medicaid-eligible individuals who have access to employer-sponsored insurance and increase the use of RIte Share benefits. Beginning October 1, 2019, the executive office shall submit the plan to be included as part of the reporting requirements under §

35-17-1

. Starting January 1, 2020, the executive office of health and human services shall include the number of Medicaid recipients with access to employer-sponsored insurance, the number of plans that did not meet the cost-effectiveness criteria for RIte Share, and enrollment in the premium assistance program as part of the reporting requirements under §

35-17-1

.

Employer-sponsored insurance. The executive office of health and human services shall dedicate staff and resources to reporting monthly as part of the requirements under §

35-17-1

which employer-sponsored insurance plans meet the cost-effectiveness criteria for RIte Share. Information in the report shall be used for screening for Medicaid enrollment to encourage Rite Share participation. By October 1, 2021, the report shall include any employers with 300 or more employees. By January 1, 2022, the report shall include employers with 100 or more employees. The January report shall also be provided to the chairperson of the house finance committee; the chairperson of the senate finance committee; the house fiscal advisor; the senate fiscal advisor; and the state budget officer.

History of Section.

P.L. 2000, ch. 200, § 2; P.L. 2000, ch. 229, § 2; P.L. 2002, ch. 65, art. 32, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 246, art. 25, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 100, art. 10, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 68, art. 23, §§ 4, 13; P.L. 2013, ch. 144, art. 19, § 5; P.L. 2018, ch. 47, art. 13, § 3; P.L. 2019, ch. 88, art. 13, § 7; P.L. 2021, ch. 162, art. 12, § 5, effective July 1, 2021.

40-8.4-13.
Utilization of available employer-based health insurance.

To the extent permitted under Titles XIX and XXI of the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. § 1396 et seq. and 42 U.S.C. § 1397aa et seq., or by waiver from the Secretary of the United States Department of Health and Human Services, the department of human services shall adopt regulations to restrict eligibility for RIte Care under this chapter and/or chapter 12.3 of title 42, or the RIte Share program under §

40-8.4-12

, for certain periods of time for certain individuals or families who have access to, or have refused or terminated employer-based health insurance and for certain periods of time for certain individuals but not including children whose employer has terminated their employer-based health insurance. The department is authorized and directed to amend the medical assistance Title XIX and XXI state plans, and/or to seek and obtain appropriate federal approvals or waivers to implement this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 2000, ch. 200, § 2; P.L. 2000, ch. 229, § 2.

40-8.4-14.
Permanent joint committee on health care oversight.

The legislature hereby finds and declares that: (1) Access to affordable, quality health and long-term care is of concern for all Rhode Islanders; (2) The complexities of the health-insurance and healthcare-delivery systems result in inefficiencies, confusion, and additional costs for consumers and other participants in the healthcare system; (3) Reform to the health-insurance and healthcare-delivery systems is achievable only through an ongoing, focused, directed, and informed effort; and (4) Steps taken to reduce the numbers of uninsured Rhode Islanders, enhance the quality of care, contain costs, ensure accessibility to services, and promote healthy lifestyles should be monitored, adjusted or expanded as needed. Therefore, there is hereby created a permanent legislative committee to monitor, study, report, and make recommendations on all areas of healthcare provision, insurance, liability, licensing, cost, and delivery of services, and the adequacy, efficacy and efficiency of statutes, rules, regulations, guidelines, practices, and programs related to health care, long-term care, or health insurance coverage in Rhode Island.

The committee consists of twelve (12) members of the general assembly: six (6) of whom shall be members of the house of representatives, to include the chair or deputy chair of the committee on finance, the chair or vice chair of the committee on corporations, the chair or vice chair of the committee on health, education and welfare; and one of whom shall be from the minority party, to be appointed by, and to serve at the discretion of, the speaker of the house of representatives; and six (6) of whom shall be from the senate, to include the chair or vice chair of the committee on finance, the chair or vice chair of the committee on commerce, housing and municipal government, the chair or vice chair of the committee on health and human services; and one of whom from the minority party, to be appointed by, and to serve at the discretion of, the president of the senate.

The committee shall have co-chairpersons, one appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives and one by the president of the senate.

The committee may review or study any matter related to the provision of healthcare services and long-term care that it considers of significance to the citizens of Rhode Island, including the availability of health care, the quality of health care, the effectiveness and efficiency of managed care systems, the efficiency and the operation of state healthcare programs, and the availability of improved processes or new technologies to achieve more effective and timely resolution of disputes, better communication, speedier, more reliable and less costly administrative processes, claims, payments, and other matters involving the interaction among any or all of government, employers, consumers of health care, providers, healthcare facilities, insurers and others. The committee may request information from any healthcare provider, healthcare facility, insurer or others. The committee may request and shall receive from any instrumentality of the state, including the department of human services, the department of business regulation, the department of health, the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals, the office of healthy aging, and the long-term care coordinating council, or any other governmental advisory body or commission, including, but not limited to, the governor’s advisory council on health, information and assistance as it deems necessary for the proper execution of its powers and duties under this section, including the annual report of the governor’s advisory council on health. The committee will undertake a comprehensive study of the state’s regulatory structure for health insurance, including the roles, relevance, impact, and coordination of current state laws and agencies involved in insurance oversight. This study will include any necessary recommendations for the restructuring of the state’s laws and regulatory bodies. The recommendations will be made to the speaker of the house and the president of the senate on or before March 1, 2005.

In addition to the notification regarding regulations required under §

40-8.4-10(b)

, the department of human services shall file with the permanent joint committee on health care oversight a detailed plan for the implementation of the programs created under this chapter by August 1, 2000.

The committee shall have the power to hold hearings, shall meet at least quarterly, may make recommendations to the general assembly, state agencies, private industry, or any other entity, and shall report to the general assembly on its findings and recommendations as it determines appropriate.

The office of the health insurance commissioner and the executive office of health and human services shall issue a series of reports to the joint committee on or before October 1 of 2012, on state implementation options related to the U.S. Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act of 2010, as amended by the Health Care and Education Reconciliation Act of 2010, and any further amendments to or regulations or guidance issued thereunder (“ACA”). These reports shall analyze the state options and make recommendations to the committee for legislative action regarding the following topics:

The feasibility of instituting a basic health program pursuant to Section 131 of the ACA, including a proposed plan for implementation;

The impact of eliminating gender as a rating factor, limiting variation in community rates based on age, and limiting waiting periods for coverage, as required under the Act;

The impact of merging the individual and small group-insurance markets on rates and coverage, including a proposed plan for implementation;

The feasibility of requiring insurance product consistency inside and outside of a state health insurance exchange, including an assessment of coverage and rate impacts; and

The substantially equivalent utilization coverage limits that the legislature may substitute for the current dollar coverage limits on numerous state health insurance mandates, to conform with the Act.

History of Section.

P.L. 2000, ch. 200, § 2; P.L. 2000, ch. 229, § 2; P.L. 2001, ch. 180, § 85; P.L. 2002, ch. 302, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 367, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 405, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 503, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 576, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 361, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 385, § 1.

40-8.4-15.
Advisory commission on health care.

There is hereby established an advisory commission to be known as the “advisory commission on health care” to advise the director of the department of human services on all matters relating to the RIte Care and RIte Share programs, and other matters concerning access for all Rhode Islanders to quality health care in the most affordable, economical manner. The director of the department of human services shall serve ex officio as chairperson. The director shall appoint the eighteen (18) members:

Three (3) of whom shall represent the healthcare providers;

Three (3) of whom shall represent the healthcare insurers;

Three (3) of whom shall represent healthcare consumers or consumer organizations;

Two (2) of whom shall represent organized labor;

One of whom shall be the health care advocate in the office of the attorney general;

Three (3) of whom shall represent employers; and

Three (3) of whom shall be other members of the public.

The commission may study all aspects of the provisions of the RIte Care and RIte Share programs involving purchasers of health care, including employers, consumers, and the state, health insurers, providers of health care, and healthcare facilities, and all matters related to the interaction among these groups, including methods to achieve more effective and timely resolution of disputes, better communication, speedier, more reliable and less-costly administrative processes, claims, payments, and other reimbursement matters, and the application of new processes or technologies to such issues.

Members of the commission shall be appointed in the month of July, each to hold office until the last day of June in the second year of his or her appointment or until his or her successor is appointed by the director.

The commission shall meet at least quarterly, and the initial meeting of the commission shall take place on or before September 15, 2000. The commission may meet more frequently than quarterly at the call of the chair or at the call of any three (3) members of the commission.

Members of the permanent joint committee on health care oversight established pursuant to §

40-8.4-14

shall be notified of each meeting of the commission and shall be invited to participate.

History of Section.

P.L. 2000, ch. 200, § 2; P.L. 2000, ch. 229, § 2.

40-8.4-16.
Pilot program for the uninsured — Legislative findings.

The general assembly hereby finds and declares that:

Although Rhode Island has one of the highest rates of health insurance coverage in the nation, gaps in coverage remain and the rate of coverage dropped significantly during the past year; and

From 2001-2002, the state’s uninsured rate for working-age adults went from eight percent (8%) to eleven percent (11%), one of eighteen (18) states in the country with a significant increase; and

Significant health-insurance-premium rate increases over the past two (2) years, especially for small businesses and the self-insured, are contributing to an increase in the rate of the uninsured; and

The largest segment of uninsured Rhode Island residents are adults with low incomes, many of whom are employed; and

Individuals without health coverage often resort to expensive emergency-room care that ultimately drives up the overall cost of care for everyone and adds to the state’s uncompensated care burden; and

Rhode Island residents’ use of the emergency room services is greater than that of the nation; and

The Institute of Medicine defines primary care as the provision of integrated, accessible healthcare services by clinicians who are accountable for addressing a large majority of personal healthcare needs, developing a sustained partnership with patients, and practicing in the context of family and community; and

Access to primary health care should be available to every resident of the state regardless of income and whether or not they have access to health insurance.

History of Section.

P.L. 2004, ch. 587, § 1.

40-8.4-17.
Pilot primary care program established.

To increase primary-care access for those state residents who do not have access to health insurance coverage, or who are unable to afford health insurance coverage, the director of the state department of human services, in collaboration with the director of the department of health, shall develop a plan for a pilot primary-care program for uninsured residents of the state. The pilot program may include enrollee premiums and co-insurance payments that are income-based with premiums and/or co-insurance subsidized by the state. The pilot program may also include catastrophic or reinsurance coverage provided under the auspices of the state. In designing the pilot program, the director may consider a variety of service-delivery and financing models, including capitation payments to private physicians, a buy-in program under RIte Care, and coverage arrangements purchased from qualified community health centers. In developing the pilot program, the director may seek available federal grant monies, including Medicaid, and private foundation grants.

The director shall submit the plan for the pilot primary-care program to the governor, the speaker of the house, the president of the senate, the majority leaders of the house and senate, and the chairpersons of the house and senate finance committees by January 15, 2005. The plan shall include: eligibility criteria for participation in the pilot program; the scope of services to be offered; the geographic area and population to be served; and cost estimates to implement the program.

History of Section.

P.L. 2004, ch. 587, § 2; P.L. 2006, ch. 216, § 20.

40-8.4-18.
Public health access beneficiary employer report.

The department of human services shall annually prepare a public-health-access-beneficiary employer report. A “public-health-access-program beneficiary” means any person who receives medical benefits from RIte Care, RIte Share, or Medicaid. Any applicant for public health-benefits through RIte-Care, RIte Share, and/or Medicaid shall identify the employer, or the employers, of the proposed beneficiary of the healthcare benefits. The report shall provide the following information for each employer of fifty (50) or more public-health-access beneficiaries:

The name and address of the employer;

The number of public-health-access-program beneficiaries who are employees of the employer;

The number of public-health-access-program beneficiaries who are spouses or dependents of employees of the employer;

Whether the employer offers health benefits to its employees;

Whether the employer participates in the RIte Share program; and

The cost to the state of Rhode Island for providing public-health-access benefits to their employees and enrolled dependents.

In determining whether the fifty-employee threshold is met, the department of human services shall include all public-health-access-program beneficiaries employed by the employer and its subsidiaries throughout the state. The report shall not include the names of any individual public-health-access-program beneficiaries and shall be subject to privacy standards pursuant to Pub. L. No. 104-91, and the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996. The report shall be submitted annually on the third Tuesday in January to the joint committee on health care oversight, the house finance committee, and the senate finance committee.

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 327, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 445, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 378, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 459, § 1.

40-8.4-19.
Managed healthcare delivery systems for families.

Notwithstanding any other provision of state law, the delivery and financing of the healthcare services provided under this chapter shall be provided through a system of managed care. “Managed care” is defined as systems that: integrate an efficient financing mechanism with quality service delivery; provide a “medical home” to ensure appropriate care and deter unnecessary services; and place emphasis on preventive and primary care.

Enrollment in managed care health delivery systems is mandatory for individuals eligible for medical assistance under this chapter. This includes children in substitute care, children receiving medical assistance through an adoption subsidy, and children eligible for medical assistance based on their disability. Beneficiaries with third-party medical coverage or insurance may be exempt from mandatory managed care in accordance with rules and regulations promulgated by the department of human services for such purposes.

Individuals who can afford to contribute shall share in the cost. The department of human services is authorized and directed to apply for and obtain any necessary waivers and/or state plan amendments from the Secretary of the United States Department of Health and Human Services, including, but not limited to, a waiver of the appropriate sections of Title XIX, 42 U.S.C. § 1396 et seq., to require that beneficiaries eligible under this chapter or chapter 12.3 of title 42, with incomes equal to or greater than one hundred fifty percent (150%) of the federal poverty level, pay a share of the costs of health coverage based on the ability to pay. The department of human services shall implement this cost-sharing obligation by regulation, and shall consider co-payments, premium shares, or other reasonable means to do so in accordance with approved provisions of appropriate waivers and/or state plan amendments approved by the Secretary of the United States Department of Health and Human Services.

History of Section.

P.L. 2008, ch. 100, art. 17, § 4; P.L. 2009, ch. 68, art. 22, § 2; P.L. 2009, ch. 69, § 2.

40-8.4-20.
Full year coverage for contraception.

No later than July 1, 2019, the executive office of health and human services (EOHHS) shall apply for the appropriate federal approval to provide Medicaid beneficiaries up to three hundred sixty-five (365) days of prescription contraception dispensed as a single prescription.

History of Section.

P.L. 2018, ch. 230, § 9; P.L. 2018, ch. 234, § 9.